Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 58
UNIFORM LIMITED COOPERATIVE ASSOCIATION ACT

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 REGISTERED AGENTS, FILING, ANNUAL REPORTS, AND STATEMENT OF FOREIGN ENTITY AUTHORITY

PART 3 FORMATION AND INITIAL ARTICLES OF LIMITED COOPERATIVE ASSOCIATION - BYLAWS

PART 4 AMENDMENT OF ARTICLES AND BYLAWS OF LIMITED COOPERATIVE ASSOCIATIONS

PART 5 MEMBERS

PART 6 MEMBER'S INTEREST IN LIMITED COOPERATIVE ASSOCIATION

PART 7 MARKETING CONTRACTS

PART 8 DIRECTORS AND OFFICERS

PART 9 INDEMNIFICATION

PART 10 CONTRIBUTIONS, ALLOCATIONS, AND DISTRIBUTIONS

PART 11 DISSOCIATION

PART 12 DISSOLUTION

PART 13 ACTION BY MEMBER

PART 14 FOREIGN COOPERATIVES

PART 15 DISPOSITION OF ASSETS

PART 16 CONVERSION AND MERGER

PART 17 MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS